Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1611
Dam, defined.

(1) Dam means any artificial barrier, including appurtenant works, with the ability to impound water, wastewater, or liquid-borne materials and which (a) is twenty-five feet or more in height from the natural bed of the stream or watercourse measured at the downstream toe of the barrier, or from the lowest elevation of the outside limit of the barrier if it is not across a stream channel or watercourse, to the maximum storage elevation or (b) has an impounding capacity at maximum storage elevation of fifty acre-feet or more, except that any barrier described in this subsection which is not in excess of six feet in height or which has an impounding capacity at maximum storage elevation of not greater than fifteen acre-feet shall be exempt, unless such barrier, due to its location or other physical characteristics, is classified as a high hazard potential dam.

(2) Dam does not include:

(a) An obstruction in a canal used to raise or lower water;

(b) A fill or structure for highway or railroad use, but if such structure serves, either primarily or secondarily, additional purposes commonly associated with dams it shall be subject to review by the Chief Water Officer;

(c) Canals, including the diversion structure, and levees; or

(d) Water storage or evaporation ponds regulated by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 274.